Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Minority" means American Indian; Alaskan native; African-American;
Hispanic, including persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, and Central or
South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic group
underrepresented in the school;
(b) "School" means an elementary or secondary educational institution that is
under the administrative control of a principal and is not a program or part of
another school. The term "school" does not include district-operated schools
that are:
1. Exclusively vocational-technical, special education, or preschool
programs;
2. Instructional programs operated in institutions or schools outside of the
district; or
3. Alternative schools designed to provide services to at-risk populations
with unique needs;
(c) "Teacher" means any person for whom certification is required as a basis of
employment in the public schools of the state, with the exception of principals
and assistant principals; and
(d) "Parent" means:
1. A parent, stepparent, or foster parent of a student; or
2. A person who has legal custody of a student pursuant to a court order
and with whom the student resides.
(2) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy for implementing school-based
decision making in the district which shall include but not be limited to a
Page 1 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
description of how the district's policies, including those developed pursuant to
KRS 160.340, have been amended to allow the professional staff members of a
school to be involved in the decision-making process as they work to meet
educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451. The policy may
include a requirement that each school council make an annual report at a public
meeting of the board describing the school's progress in meeting the educational
goals set forth in KRS 158.6451 and district goals established by the board. The
policy shall also address and comply with the following:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, each participating
school shall form a school council composed of two (2) parents, three (3)
teachers, and the principal or administrator. The membership of the council
may be increased, but it may only be increased proportionately. A parent
representative on the council shall not be an employee or a relative of an
employee of the school in which that parent serves, nor shall the parent
representative be an employee or a relative of an employee in the district
administrative offices. A parent representative shall not be a local board
member or a board member's spouse. None of the members shall have a
conflict of interest pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A, except the salary paid to
district employees;
(b) 1. The teacher representatives shall be elected for one (1) year terms by a
majority of the teachers. A teacher elected to a school council shall not
be involuntarily transferred during his or her term of office. The parent
representatives shall be elected for one (1) year terms. The parent
members shall be elected by the parents of students preregistered to
attend the school during the term of office in an election conducted by
the parent and teacher organization of the school or, if none exists, the
largest organization of parents formed for this purpose. Council
Page 2 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
elections may allow voting to occur over multiple days and via
electronic means. A school council, once elected, may adopt a policy
setting different terms of office for parent and teacher members
subsequently elected. The principal shall be the chair of the school
council.
2. School councils in schools having eight percent (8%) or more minority
students enrolled, as determined by the enrollment on the preceding
October 1, shall have at least one (1) minority member. If the council
formed under paragraph (a) of this subsection does not have a minority
member, the principal, in a timely manner, shall be responsible for
carrying out the following:
a. Organizing a special election to elect an additional member. The
principal shall call for nominations and shall notify the parents of
the students of the date, time, and location of the election to elect a
minority parent to the council by ballot; and
b. Allowing the teachers in the building to select one (1) minority
teacher to serve as a teacher member on the council. If there are no
minority teachers who are members of the faculty, an additional
teacher member shall be elected by a majority of all teachers.
Term limitations shall not apply for a minority teacher member
who is the only minority on faculty;
(c) 1. The school council shall have the responsibility to set school policy that
shall be consistent with district board policy and which shall provide an
environment to enhance the students' achievement and help the school
meet the goals established by KRS 158.645 and 158.6451 and goals for
the district established by the board. The principal shall be the primary
administrator and the instructional leader of the school, and with the
Page 3 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
assistance of the total school staff shall administer the policies
established by the school council and the local board.
2. If a school council establishes committees, it shall adopt a policy to
facilitate the participation of interested persons, including[,] but not
limited to[,] classified employees and parents. The policy shall include
the number of committees, their jurisdiction, composition, and the
process for membership selection;
(d) The school council and each of its committees shall determine the frequency
of and agenda for their meetings. Matters relating to formation of school
councils that are not provided for by this section shall be addressed by local
board policy;
(e) The meetings of the school council shall be open to the public and all
interested persons may attend. However, the exceptions to open meetings
provided in KRS 61.810 shall apply;
(f) After receiving notification of the funds available for the school from the local
board, the school council shall determine, within the parameters of the total
available funds, the number of persons to be employed in each job
classification at the school. The council may make personnel decisions on
vacancies occurring after the school council is formed but shall not have the
authority to recommend transfers or dismissals;
(g) The local superintendent shall determine which curriculum, textbooks,
instructional materials, and student support services shall be provided in the
school after consulting with the local board of education, the school principal,
and the school council and after a reasonable review and response period for
stakeholders in accordance with local board of education policy. Subject to
available resources, the local board shall allocate an appropriation to each
school that is adequate to meet the school's needs related to instructional
Page 4 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
materials and school-based student support services, as determined by the
school principal after consultation with the school council. The school council
shall consult with the school media librarian on the maintenance of the school
library media center, including the purchase of instructional materials,
information technology, and equipment;
(h) Personnel decisions at the school level shall be as follows:
1. From a list of qualified applicants submitted by the local superintendent,
the principal at the participating school shall select personnel to fill
vacancies, after consultation with the school council, consistent with
paragraph (i)11. of this subsection. The superintendent shall provide
additional applicants to the principal upon request when qualified
applicants are available. The superintendent may forward to the school
principal the names of qualified applicants who have pending
certification from the Education Professional Standards Board based on
recent completion of preparation requirements, out-of-state preparation,
or alternative routes to certification pursuant to KRS 161.028 and
161.048. Requests for transfer shall conform to any employer-employee
bargained contract which is in effect;
2. If the vacancy to be filled is the position of principal:
a. The superintendent shall fill the vacancy after consultation with
the school council consistent with paragraph (i)11. of this
subsection;
b. Prior to consultation with the school council, each member shall
sign a nondisclosure agreement forbidding the disclosure of
information shared and discussions held during consultation;
c. A person who believes a violation of the nondisclosure agreement
referred to in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has occurred may
Page 5 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
file a written complaint with the Kentucky Board of Education;
and
d. A school council member found to have violated the nondisclosure
agreement referred to in subdivision b. of this subparagraph may
be subject to removal from the school council by the Kentucky
Board of Education under subsection (9)(e) of this section;
3. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, if the vacancy to be
filled is the position of principal in a county school district in a county
with a consolidated local government adopted under KRS Chapter 67C,
then:
a. The outgoing principal shall not serve on the council during the
principal selection process. The superintendent or the
superintendent's designee shall serve as the chair of the council for
the purpose of the hiring process and shall have voting rights
during the selection process;
b. The council shall have access to the applications of all persons
certified for the position. The principal shall be elected on a
majority vote of the membership of the council. The school
council shall receive training in recruitment and interviewing
techniques prior to carrying out the process of selecting a
principal. The council shall select the trainer to deliver the
training; and
c. Notwithstanding the requirement that a principal be elected by a
majority vote of the council, the selection of a principal shall be
subject to approval by the superintendent. If the superintendent
does not approve the principal selected by the council, then the
superintendent may select the principal;
Page 6 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
4. No principal who has been previously removed from a position in the
district for cause may be considered for appointment as principal in that
district;
5. Personnel decisions made at the school level under the authority of
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be binding on the superintendent
who completes the hiring process;
6. Applicants subsequently employed shall provide evidence that they are
certified prior to assuming the duties of a position in accordance with
KRS 161.020; and
7. Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, if the applicant is
the spouse of the superintendent and the applicant meets the service
requirements of KRS 160.380(3)(a), the applicant shall only be
employed upon the recommendation of the principal and the approval of
a majority vote of the school council;
(i) The school council shall adopt a policy that shall be consistent with local
board policy and shall be implemented by the principal in the following
additional areas:
1. Curriculum responsibilities under KRS 158.6453(19);
2. Assignment of all instructional and noninstructional staff time;
3. Assignment of students to classes and programs within the school;
4. Determination of the schedule of the school day and week, subject to the
beginning and ending times of the school day and school calendar year
as established by the local board;
5. Assignment of students to a lunch period of at least thirty (30) minutes
in length during the school day;
6. Determination of use of school space during the school day related to
improving classroom teaching and learning;
Page 7 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
7.[6.] Planning and resolution of issues regarding instructional practices;
8.[7.] Selection and implementation of discipline and classroom management
techniques as a part of a comprehensive school safety plan, including
responsibilities of the student, parent, teacher, counselor, and principal;
9.[8.] Selection of extracurricular programs and determination of policies
relating to student participation based on academic qualifications and
attendance requirements, program evaluation, and supervision;
10.[9.] Adoption of an emergency plan as required in KRS 158.162;
11.[10.] Procedures, consistent with local school board policy, for
determining alignment with state standards, technology utilization, and
program appraisal; and
12.[11.] Procedures to assist the council with consultation in the selection
of the principal by the superintendent, and the selection of personnel by
the principal, including but not limited to meetings, timelines,
interviews, review of written applications, and review of references.
Procedures shall address situations in which members of the council are
not available for consultation; and
(j) Each school council shall annually review data as shown on state and local
student assessments required under KRS 158.6453. The data shall include but
not be limited to information on performance levels of all students tested, and
information on the performance of students disaggregated by race, gender,
disability, and participation in the federal free and reduced price lunch
program. After completing the review of data, each school council, with the
involvement of parents, faculty, and staff, shall develop and adopt a plan to
ensure that each student makes progress toward meeting the goals set forth in
KRS 158.645 and 158.6451(1)(b) by April 1 of each year and submit the plan
to the superintendent and local board of education for review as described in
Page 8 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
KRS 160.340. The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide each
school council the data needed to complete the review required by this
paragraph no later than October 1 of each year. If a school does not have a
council, the review shall be completed by the principal with the involvement
of parents, faculty, and staff.
(3) The policies adopted by the local board to implement school-based decision making
shall also address the following:
(a) School budget and administration, including: discretionary funds; activity and
other school funds; funds for maintenance, supplies, and equipment; and
procedures for authorizing reimbursement for training and other expenses;
(b) Assessment of individual student progress, including testing and reporting of
student progress to students, parents, the school district, the community, and
the state;
(c) School improvement plans, including the form and function of strategic
planning and its relationship to district planning, as well as the school safety
plan and requests for funding from the Center for School Safety under KRS
158.446;
(d) Professional development plans developed pursuant to KRS 156.095;
(e) Parent, citizen, and community participation including the relationship of the
council with other groups;
(f) Cooperation and collaboration within the district, with other districts, and with
other public and private agencies;
(g) Requirements for waiver of district policies;
(h) Requirements for record keeping by the school council; and
(i) A process for appealing a decision made by a school council.
(4) In addition to the authority granted to the school council in this section, the local
board may grant to the school council any other authority permitted by law. The
Page 9 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
board shall make available liability insurance coverage for the protection of all
members of the school council from liability arising in the course of pursuing their
duties as members of the council.
(5) All schools shall implement school-based decision making in accordance with this
section and with the policy adopted by the local board pursuant to this section.
Upon favorable vote of a majority of the faculty at the school and a majority of at
least twenty-five (25) voting parents of students enrolled in the school, a school
meeting its goal as determined by the Department of Education pursuant to KRS
158.6455 may apply to the Kentucky Board of Education for exemption from the
requirement to implement school-based decision making, and the state board shall
grant the exemption. The voting by the parents on the matter of exemption from
implementing school-based decision making shall be in an election conducted by
the parent and teacher organization of the school or, if none exists, the largest
organization of parents formed for this purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of
this section, a local school district shall not be required to implement school-based
decision making if the local school district contains only one (1) school.
(6) The Department of Education shall provide professional development activities to
assist schools in implementing school-based decision making. School council
members elected for the first time shall complete a minimum of six (6) clock hours
of training in the process of school-based decision making, no later than thirty (30)
days after the beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve.
School council members who have served on a school council at least one (1) year
shall complete a minimum of three (3) clock hours of training in the process of
school-based decision making no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the
beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve. Experienced
members may participate in the training for new members to fulfill their training
requirement. School council training required under this subsection shall be
Page 10 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
conducted by trainers endorsed by the Department of Education. By November 1 of
each year, the principal through the local superintendent shall forward to the
Department of Education the names and addresses of each council member and
verify that the required training has been completed. School council members
elected to fill a vacancy shall complete the applicable training within thirty (30)
days of their election.
(7) A school that chooses to have school-based decision making but would like to be
exempt from the administrative structure set forth by this section may develop a
model for implementing school-based decision making, including but not limited to
a description of the membership, organization, duties, and responsibilities of a
school council. The school shall submit the model through the local board of
education to the commissioner of education and the Kentucky Board of Education,
which shall have final authority for approval. The application for approval of the
model shall show evidence that it has been developed by representatives of the
parents, students, certified personnel, and the administrators of the school and that
two-thirds (2/3) of the faculty have agreed to the model.
(8) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of
education, shall adopt by administrative regulation a formula by which school
district funds shall be allocated to each school council. Included in the school
council formula shall be an allocation for professional development that is at least
sixty-five percent (65%) of the district's per pupil state allocation for professional
development for each student in average daily attendance in the school. The school
council shall plan professional development in compliance with requirements
specified in KRS 156.095, except as provided in KRS 158.649. School councils of
small schools shall be encouraged to work with other school councils to maximize
professional development opportunities.
(9) (a) No board member, superintendent of schools, district employee, or member of
Page 11 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
a school council shall intentionally engage in a pattern of practice which is
detrimental to the successful implementation of or circumvents the intent of
school-based decision making to allow the professional staff members of a
school and parents to be involved in the decision making process in working
toward meeting the educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and
158.6451 or to make decisions in areas of policy assigned to a school council
pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An affected party who believes a violation of this subsection has occurred
may file a written complaint with the Office of Education Accountability. The
office shall investigate the complaint and resolve the conflict, if possible, or
forward the matter to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall conduct a hearing in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B for complaints referred by the Office of Education
Accountability.
(d) If the state board determines a violation has occurred, the party shall be
subject to reprimand. A second violation of this subsection may be grounds
for removing a superintendent or a member of a school council from office or
grounds for dismissal of an employee for misconduct in office or willful
neglect of duty.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of this subsection and KRS 7.410(2)(c), if the
state board determines a violation of the nondisclosure agreement required by
subsection (2)(h)2.b. of this section by a school council member has occurred,
the state board shall remove the member from the school council, and the
member shall be permanently prohibited from serving on any school council
in the district.
(10) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (9) of this section, a school's right to establish or
maintain a school-based decision making council and the powers, duties, and
Page 12 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
authority granted to a school council may be rescinded or the school council's role
may be advisory if the commissioner of education or the Kentucky Board of
Education takes action under KRS 160.346.
(11) Each school council of a school containing grades K-5 or any combination thereof,
or if there is no school council, the principal, shall develop and implement a
wellness policy that includes moderate to vigorous physical activity each day and
encourages healthy choices among students. The policy may permit physical
activity to be considered part of the instructional day, not to exceed thirty (30)
minutes per day, or one hundred and fifty (150) minutes per week. Each school
council, or if there is no school council, the principal, shall adopt an assessment tool
to determine each child's level of physical activity on an annual basis. The council
or principal may utilize an existing assessment program. The Kentucky Department
of Education shall make available a list of available resources to carry out the
provisions of this subsection. The department shall report to the Legislative
Research Commission no later than November 1 of each year on how the schools
are providing physical activity under this subsection and on the types of physical
activity being provided. The policy developed by the school council or principal
shall comply with provisions required by federal law, state law, or local board
policy.
Section 2. KRS 158.153 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Unless the action is taken pursuant to KRS 158.150, no school, school
administrator, teacher, or other school employee shall expel or punish a child based
on information contained in a record of an adjudication of delinquency or
conviction of an offense received by the school pursuant to KRS 610.345 or from
any other source. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a local
school board or school official from instituting disciplinary proceedings against any
student for violating the discipline policy of the school or school district or taking
Page 13 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
actions necessary to protect staff and students. Actions to protect staff and students
may be taken only after the principal makes a determination that the conduct of the
student reflected in the records of the school or obtained by the school from the
court indicates a substantial likelihood of an immediate and continuing threat that
the student will cause harm to students or staff, and that the restrictions to be
ordered represent the least restrictive alternative available and appropriate to
remedy the threat, and that the determination and supporting material be
documented in the child's record. The action of the principal, in addition to or in
lieu of any other procedure available, may be appealed by the child or the child's
parent or guardian to the superintendent of the school system or to the Circuit Court
in the county in which the school is located, and the appealing party may be
represented by counsel.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 610.345, no school, school administrator, teacher, or
other school employee who has custody of records received or maintained by the
school pursuant to KRS 610.345 or who has received information contained in or
relating to a record received by the school pursuant to KRS 610.345 shall disclose
the fact of the record's existence, or any information contained in the record or
received from the record to any other person, including but not limited to other
teachers, school employees, pupils, or parents other than the pupil, or parents of the
pupil who is the subject of the record.
(3) The child and his or her parent or guardian shall have a civil cause of action against
the school board and against any school administrator violating subsection (1) or (2)
of this section or divulging information in violation of KRS 610.345 or 610.340.
This civil cause of action shall be in addition to any other criminal or administrative
remedy provided by law.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a local board of education
from establishing districtwide standards of behavior for students who participate in
Page 14 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 829
extracurricular and cocurricular activities, including athletics. A school principal
may deny or terminate a student's eligibility to participate in extracurricular or
cocurricular activities if the student has violated the local district behavior standards
or the council's criteria for participation, as described in KRS 160.345(2)(i)9.[8.] A
student's right to participate in extracurricular or cocurricular activities, including
athletics, may be suspended, pending investigation of an allegation that the
standards of behavior have been violated.
Page 15 of 15
XXXX 1/8/2025 5:17 PM Jacketed